District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.09

Voluntary Foster Care Registry Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Voluntary Foster Care Registry Fund (“VFCR Fund”), into which shall be deposited all fees collected pursuant to § 4-1303.08(c)(2)(A) and any gift or appropriation intended to assist in the funding of the Voluntary Foster Care Registry, which shall be solely used to cover the costs of administering the Voluntary Foster Care Registry.

(b)

All funds deposited into the VFCR Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the purpose set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 309
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-230, § 301(b), 57 DCR 6951
D.C. Law 18-230 added this section.
Section 110 of D.C. Law 19-226 repealed D.C. Law 18-230, § 701.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 18-230, § 701, see § 110 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 18-230, § 701, see § 110 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-230, § 701, see § 7012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-230, § 701, see § 7012 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 701 of D.C. Law 18-230 provided: “Sec. 701. Applicability. Title III of this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 7012 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-230, § 701.